California, session 20252026, AB891.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 91.3 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:91.3. (a) The Quick-Build Project Pilot Program is hereby established, within the department’s maintenance program, established to expedite development and implementation of low-cost projects, improvements, including, but not limited to, bicycle and pedestrian facilities, on the state highway system in a manner consistent with the guidance developed pursuant to subdivision (b).(b) On or before December 31, 2027, the department shall develop and publish all necessary guidance for the deployment of district quick-build projects. improvements.(c) On or before December 31, 2028, the department shall identify and commit to funding a minimum of six quick-build projects improvements statewide under the Quick-Build Project Pilot Program.(d) For purposes of this section, a “quick-build project” means an interim capital infrastructure project that requires minor construction activities but is built with durable, low- to moderate-cost materials, and lasts from one to five years, inclusive. improvement” includes, but is not limited to, work related to the installation of signage, lane markings, and other low-cost measures to improve the safety of bicycle and pedestrian facilities on the state highway system.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.